Utah statutes.
76-3-103.   Felonies classified.

(1) Felonies are classified into four categories:

(a)  Capital felonies;

(b)  Felonies of the first degree;

(c)  Felonies of the second degree;

(d)  Felonies of the third degree.

(2)  An offense designated as a felony either in this code or in another law, without specification as to punishment or category, is a felony of the third degree.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

